Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2572.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Subject to the requirements of article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, section 15-1803, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-1803. Alien in-state student status; nonresident tuition exemption A. An alien is entitled to classification as an in-state refugee student if the person has been granted refugee status in accordance with all applicable laws of the United States and has met all other requirements for domicile. B. Notwithstanding any other law, a student, other than a nonimmigrant alien as described in 8 United States Code section 1101(a)(15), who meets both of the following requirements is eligible for in-state tuition at any university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents or at any community college as defined in section 15-1401: 1. Attended any or is attending a public or private high school option or homeschool equivalent pursuant to section 15-802 while physically present in this state for at least two years. 2. Graduated from any public or private high school option or homeschool equivalent pursuant to section 15-802 while physically present in this state or obtained a high school equivalency diploma in this state. C. Persons without lawful immigration status are eligible for in-state tuition pursuant to subsection B of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Requirements for enactment; three-fourths vote Pursuant to article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, section 15-1803, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.